Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.180

Expenditure of funds collected.

All moneys which are collected or otherwise received pursuant to each marketing order created under this chapter shall be used solely by and for the commodity commission concerned and shall not be used for any other commission, nor the department except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Such moneys shall be deposited in a separate account or accounts in the name of the individual commission in any bank which is a state depositary. All expenses and disbursements incurred and made pursuant to the provisions of any marketing order shall be paid from moneys collected and received pursuant to such order without the necessity of a specific legislative appropriation and all moneys deposited for the account of any order shall be paid from said account by check or voucher in such form and in such manner and upon the signature of such person as may be prescribed by the commission. None of the provisions of RCW 43.01.050 shall be applicable to any such account or any moneys so received, collected or expended.

[ 2002 c 313 s 61; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.180. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.